Nebraska, session 109, LB333.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB333 LB333
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-462, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-462 Sections 60-462 to 60-4,189 and section 5 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.
Sec. 2. Section 60-4,131, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-4,131 (1) Sections 60-462.01 and 60-4,132 to 60-4,172 and section
5 of this act shall apply to the operation of any commercial motor
vehicle.
(2) For purposes of such sections:
(a) Disqualification means:
(i) The suspension, revocation, cancellation, or any other
withdrawal by a state of a person's privilege to operate a commercial
motor vehicle;
(ii) A determination by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration, under the rules of practice for motor carrier safety
contained in 49 C.F.R. part 386, that a person is no longer qualified to
operate a commercial motor vehicle under 49 C.F.R. part 391; or
(iii) The loss of qualification which automatically follows
conviction of an offense listed in 49 C.F.R. 383.51;
(b) Downgrade means the state:
(i) Allows the driver of a commercial motor vehicle to change his or
her self-certification to interstate, but operating exclusively in
transportation or operation excepted from 49 C.F.R. part 391, as provided
in 49 C.F.R. 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3;
(ii) Allows the driver of a commercial motor vehicle to change his
or her self-certification to intrastate only, if the driver qualifies
under a state's physical qualification requirements for intrastate only;
(iii) Allows the driver of a commercial motor vehicle to change his
or her certification to intrastate, but operating exclusively in
transportation or operations excepted from all or part of a state driver
-2-

LB333 LB333
2025 2025
qualification requirement; or
(iv) Removes the commercial driver's license privilege from the
operator's license;
(c) Employee means any operator of a commercial motor vehicle,
including full-time, regularly employed drivers; casual, intermittent, or
occasional drivers; and leased drivers and independent, owner-operator
contractors, while in the course of operating a commercial motor vehicle,
who are either directly employed by or under lease to an employer;
(d) Employer means any person, including the United States, a state,
the District of Columbia, or a political subdivision of a state, that
owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle or assigns employees to operate
a commercial motor vehicle;
(e) Endorsement means an authorization to an individual's CLP-
commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license required to
permit the individual to operate certain types of commercial motor
vehicles;
(f) Foreign means outside the fifty United States and the District
of Columbia;
(g) Imminent hazard means the existence of a condition relating to
hazardous material that presents a substantial likelihood that death,
serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to
health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably
foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the
risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment;
(h) Issue and issuance means initial issuance, transfer, renewal, or
upgrade of a commercial driver's license or nondomiciled commercial
driver's license, or issuance, transfer, or upgrade of a CLP-commercial
learner's permit or nondomiciled CLP-commercial learner's permit, as
described in 49 C.F.R. 383.73;
(i) Medical examiner means an individual certified by the Federal
Motor Carrier Safety Administration and listed on the National Registry
-3-

LB333 LB333
2025 2025
of Certified Medical Examiners in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 390,
subpart D;
(j) Medical examiner's certificate means a form meeting the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. 391.43 issued by a medical examiner in
compliance with such regulation;
(k) Medical variance means the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration has provided a driver with either an exemption letter
permitting operation of a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to 49 C.F.R.
381, subpart C, or 49 C.F.R. 391.64 or a Skill Performance Evaluation
Certificate permitting operation of a commercial motor vehicle pursuant
to 49 C.F.R. 391.49;
(l) Nondomiciled CLP-commercial learner's permit or nondomiciled
commercial driver's license means a CLP-commercial learner's permit or
commercial driver's license, respectively, issued by this state or other
jurisdiction under either of the following two conditions:
(i) To an individual domiciled in a foreign country meeting the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. 383.23(b)(1); or
(ii) To an individual domiciled in another state meeting the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. 383.23(b)(2);
(m) Representative vehicle means a motor vehicle which represents
the type of motor vehicle that a driver applicant operates or expects to
operate;
(n) State means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia;
(o) State of domicile means that state where a person has his or her
true, fixed, and permanent home and principal residence and to which he
or she has the intention of returning whenever he or she is absent;
(p) Tank vehicle means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed
to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or tanks that
have an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred nineteen
gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more
-4-

LB333 LB333
2025 2025
and that are either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or
the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage
container tank, not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of
one thousand gallons or more that is temporarily attached to a flatbed
trailer is not considered a tank vehicle;
(q) Third-party skills test examiner means a person employed by a
third-party tester who is authorized by this state to administer the
commercial driver's license skills tests specified in 49 C.F.R. part 383,
subparts G and H;
(r) Third-party tester means a person, including, but not limited
to, another state, a motor carrier, a private driver training facility or
other private institution, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of
a local government, authorized by this state to employ skills test
examiners to administer the commercial driver's license skills tests
specified in 49 C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H;
(s) United States means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia; and
(t) Vehicle group means a class or type of vehicle with certain
operating characteristics.
Sec. 3. Section 60-4,131.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-4,131.01 Sections 60-462.01 and 60-4,132 to 60-4,172 and section
5 of this act shall not apply to individuals who operate commercial motor
vehicles for military purposes, including and limited to:
(1) Active duty military personnel;
(2) Members of the military reserves, other than military
technicians;
(3) Active duty United States Coast Guard personnel; and
(4) Members of the National Guard on active duty, including:
(a) Personnel on full-time National Guard duty;
(b) Personnel on part-time National Guard training; and
-5-

LB333 LB333
2025 2025
(c) National Guard military technicians required to wear military
uniforms.
Such individuals must have a valid military driver's license unless
such individual is operating the vehicle under written orders from a
commanding officer in an emergency declared by the federal government or
by the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 4. Section 60-4,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-4,132 The purposes of sections 60-462.01, 60-4,133, and 60-4,137
to 60-4,172 and section 5 of this act are to implement the requirements
mandated by the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, 49
U.S.C. 31100 et seq., the federal Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Act of
1999, Public Law 106-159, 49 U.S.C. 101 et seq., section 1012 of the
federal Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools
Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, USA PATRIOT
Act, 49 U.S.C. 5103a, and federal regulations as such acts and
regulations existed on January 1, 2024, and to reduce or prevent
commercial motor vehicle accidents, fatalities, and injuries by: (1)
Permitting drivers to hold only one operator's license; (2) disqualifying
drivers for specified offenses and serious traffic violations; and (3)
strengthening licensing and testing standards.
Sec. 5. Any person who is eighteen years of age or older and who
holds a valid commercial driver's license may be issued a hazardous
materials endorsement to haul hazardous materials intrastate.
Sec. 6. Original sections 60-462, 60-4,131, 60-4,131.01, and
60-4,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-